District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Health and Human Service Programs and Benefits Eligibility and
Delivery Data-Sharing Clarifications Amendment Act of 2026".
Sec. 2. The Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective October 22, 2005 (D.C.
Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code§ 4-751.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 9(a)(7) (D.C. Official Code§ 4-754. l l(a)(7)) is amended by striking the
phrase "consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law" and inserting
the phrase "consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law, subject to
the authorized uses and mandatory disclosures of such records and information for the purposes
of and in accordance with Title I of the Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Amendment
Act of 2010, effective December 4, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-273; D.C. Official Code§ 7-241 et
seq.)" in its place.

(b) Section 12(12) (D.C. Official Code § 4-754.21(12)) is amended by striking the phrase
“consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law” and inserting the
phrase “consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law, subject to the
authorized uses and mandatory disclosures of such records and information for the purposes of
and in accordance with Title I of the Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Amendment
Act of 2010, effective December 4, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-273; D.C. Official Code § 7-241 et
seq.)” in its place.
Sec. 3. The Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Amendment Act of 2010,
effective December 4, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-273; D.C. Official Code § 7-241 et seq. ), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 101 (1) (D.C. Official Code § 7-241(1)) is amended by striking the phrase
“or instrumentality of the District of Columbia government.” and inserting the phrase “authority,
or instrumentality of the District of Columbia government, or any subdivision of such agency,
department, unit, authority, or instrumentality.” in its place.
(b) The lead-in language of section 102(a) (D.C. Official Code § 7-242(a)) is amended by
striking the phrase “In accordance with section 103 and without” and inserting the word
“Without” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.


This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.